Utah statutes.
11-13-206.   Requirements for agreements for joint or cooperative action.

(1)  Each agreement under Section 11-13-202, 11-13-203, or 11-13-205 shall specify:

(a)  its duration;

(b)  if the agreement creates an interlocal entity:

(i)  the precise organization, composition, and nature of the interlocal entity;

(ii)  the powers delegated to the interlocal entity;

(iii)  the manner in which the interlocal entity is to be governed; and

(iv)  subject to Subsection (2), the manner in which the members of its governing body are to be appointed or selected;

(c)  its purpose or purposes;

(d)  the manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget for it;

(e)  the permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination; and

(f)  any other necessary and proper matters.

(2)  Each agreement under Section 11-13-203 or 11-13-205 that creates an interlocal entity shall require that Utah public agencies that are parties to the agreement have the right to appoint or select members of the interlocal entity's governing body with a majority of the voting power.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

